Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 3 Competitive Cable and Video Services Act
7-59-312. Personal claims — Findings of noncompliance — Civil penalties — Revocation of certificate.

Individuals possess standing to bring claims as established in this part only for personal claims and not on behalf of other individuals. A municipality or county possesses standing to pursue claims on behalf of citizens residing within the county or municipality. In addition to all other remedies available under the law, upon receipt of a complaint from an individual, or upon receipt of a complaint brought by a municipality or county alleging a violation of § 7-59-311(a) or (b) concerning nondiscrimination and deployment of services, § 7-59-304(a)(1) requiring a franchise, § 7-59-305(c)(8) and (10) concerning notice requirements, § 7-59-305(h) concerning terminations of franchises, § 7-59-305(i) concerning amendments to state-issued certificates of franchise authority, § 7-59-309 concerning public, educational and governmental access channels, and § 7-59-313 concerning minority-owned business participation plans by a holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority, the department shall investigate the complaint and make a determination as to whether a violation has occurred. Except as expressly provided by this section or other specific provisions of this part, the department has no authority to regulate cable or video service provided by a holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority in this state, including, but not limited to, the rates, terms, or conditions of that service, and except to the extent that complaint authority is explicitly provided for in this section, the department has no general complaint authority to hear matters related to cable or video service or franchising.

Upon receipt of the complaint, except as otherwise provided by this part, the department shall serve a copy of the complaint on the subject holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority who shall have thirty (30) days after receipt to submit a written response and any other relevant information the holder wishes to submit in response to the complaint.

Upon a finding by the department that a violation of § 7-59-311(a) has occurred, the holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority shall have a reasonable period of time, as determined by the department, to cure the noncompliance. If the holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority fails to cure within the specified time as determined by the department, the department may assess a civil penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each such violation or noncompliance. For purposes of this section, discrimination against each individual member of a group constitutes a separate violation and is subject to a separate penalty as set forth in this section.

Upon a finding by the department that a violation of any provision enumerated in subsection (a), other than a violation of § 7-59-311(a) or (b) or a violation of § 7-59-313, has occurred, the holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority shall have a reasonable period of time, as determined by the department, to cure the noncompliance. If the holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority fails to cure within the specified time as determined by the department, the department may assess a civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day of the violation or noncompliance, not to exceed a total of ten thousand dollars ($10,000), counting all subscribers as a single violation or act of noncompliance; provided, however, that if the violation or noncompliance arises from the failure of the holder to meet the requirements of § 7-59-311(b), then the department may assess a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each day of the violation or noncompliance, not to exceed a total of two million dollars ($2,000,000).

Upon a finding by the department that a violation of § 7-59-313 has occurred, the holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority shall have a reasonable period of time, as determined by the department, to cure the noncompliance. If the holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority fails to cure within the specified time as determined by the department, the department may assess a civil penalty of not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and not more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), per violation.

In determining whether a civil penalty is appropriate, the department shall consider all of the following factors:

The seriousness of the noncompliance;

The good faith efforts of the holder to comply;

The holder's history of noncompliance;

The financial resources of the holder; and

Any other circumstances as determined by the department.

The department may revoke, in whole or in part, a state-issued certificate of franchise authority if the department finds that a holder has acted in bad faith by repeatedly and knowingly failing to comply with a final department order requiring it to remedy violations of and noncompliance with § 7-59-311(a) and (b). A determination to revoke a state-issued certificate of franchise authority shall take into account each of the factors enumerated in subdivisions (e)(1)-(5).

Imposition of any civil penalty or a determination to revoke a franchise may be appealed by the holder within forty-five (45) days of the issuance of the penalty. Appeals shall be filed in any court of competent jurisdiction, which shall review the underlying decision de novo. The filing of an appeal shall not automatically stay a monetary penalty or order to cure, but an appeal shall automatically stay any order of revocation. Upon a showing of cure after the imposition of any penalty or revocation, the department may, but is not required to, reduce the penalty or rescind the revocation.

Any penalties assessed under subsection (c) or (d) shall be paid to the state treasurer for deposit into the Tennessee broadband accessibility fund, created pursuant to § 4-3-708.

Acts 2008, ch. 932, § 13; 2017, ch. 228, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2017, ch. 228, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Broadband Accessibility Act.”

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee broadband accessibility fund, created pursuant to §4-3-708” for “Tennessee broadband deployment fund, created pursuant to §7-59-315” at the end of (h).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 228, § 16. April 24, 2017.

7-59-313. Minority-owned business participation plan — Compliance report.

For the purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Minority-owned business” means a business that is solely owned, or at least fifty-one percent (51%) of the assets or outstanding stock of which is owned, by an individual who personally manages and controls the daily operations of the business and who is impeded from normal entry into the economic mainstream because of:

Past practices of discrimination based on race, religion, ethnic background or sex, including, but not limited to, women;

A disability as defined in § 4-26-102, including, but not limited to, disabled veterans; or

Past practices of racial discrimination against African-Americans; and

“Minority-owned business participation plan” means a business plan for actively soliciting bids from minority-owned businesses and letting contracts to such businesses when establishing, providing or expanding cable or video services and related support facilities. The plan shall include the following information:

A proposal for purchasing goods and services from minority-owned businesses;

Information on programs to provide technical assistance to such businesses; and

A statement of intent to follow its minority-owned business participation plan.

A minority-owned business participation plan shall strive to maximize participation of minority-owned businesses through both prime and second tier business contracting opportunities and shall strive to achieve a level of minority-owned business participation representative of the population demographics of this state.

Notwithstanding any provision of this part to the contrary, a state-issued certificate of franchise authority shall not be issued by the department to any applicant that fails to include a minority-owned business participation plan in the applicant's application. The department shall review each application to confirm that the minority-owned business participation plan includes all information required pursuant to this section.

Notwithstanding any provision of this part to the contrary, the department shall annually review each holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority to determine compliance with the holder's minority-owned business participation plan. In conjunction with the review, by January 31 of each year, each holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority shall prepare and submit an annual report to the department concerning the holder's minority-owned business participation plan and compliance with the plan. The department shall annually prepare a compliance report to be delivered to the governor and the clerks of the senate and the house of representatives. The compliance report shall also be posted on the web site of the department.

Notwithstanding any provision of this part to the contrary, a holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority determined by the department not to be in compliance with the holder's minority business participation plan shall be found in violation of this section and shall be subject to § 7-59-312(d)(2).

Acts 2008, ch. 932, § 14.

7-59-314. Duties of department — Report.

Beginning on March 1, 2009, the department shall file a report on March 1 of each year until 2011 with the speaker of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, the governor, the chair of the commerce and labor committee of the senate and the chair of the commerce committee of the house of representatives. The report shall be compiled by the department. The report shall contain the following information:

The number of applications made for state-issued certificates of franchise authority and amendments to the applications during the prior year;

The number of applications or amendments approved;

The number of applications or amendments denied and the reason for the denials;

The service areas covered by each holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority;

The number of customer complaints and a description of the efficacy of the department's complaint resolution process;

The number of municipalities or counties in which two (2) or more cable or video service providers are serving customers; and

The department's aggregated summary of low-income households' access reports submitted by holders of state-issued certificates of franchise authority.

In preparing this report, the department shall rely on information filed with the department or available as public information, but the department shall not issue mandatory data requests or subpoenas to collect the information. The department may invite all cable or video service providers to submit voluntary reports supplying information relating to the services and products offered in this state, and any other information the cable or video services providers volunteer regarding future plans for deployment, new services, new technology, or the impact of competition. All such reports received shall be appended to the department's report.

Upon receipt of an application to obtain a state-issued certificate of franchise authority, the department shall notify all municipalities or counties identified as part of the applicant's service area to obtain the following information:

The number of activated PEG channels for the municipality or county; and

The terms of any PEG support being provided by the incumbent cable provider.

The department shall compile and keep current the information for the use of holders of state-issued certificates of franchise authority. If a municipality or county fails to provide this information after being requested to do so by the department, the holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority shall not be held in violation or noncompliance with § 7-59-309 with regard to the municipality or county until such time as the department has received the information and the holder has been given adequate time to comply with § 7-59-309.

Acts 2008, ch. 932, § 15.

7-59-315. [Repealed.]

Acts 2008, ch. 932, § 16; 2013, ch. 204, § 5; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 228, § 5, effective April 24, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2017, ch. 228, § 1 provided that the act, which repealed this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Broadband Accessibility Act.”

Former §7-59-315 concerned the Tennessee broadband deployment fund.

7-59-316. Telecommunications joint venture — Application.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, notwithstanding chapter 52 of this title and title 65, chapter 25, or any other state law to the contrary, a county or municipality, or any entity otherwise authorized by law to act on a county or municipality's behalf, or a cooperative is authorized to participate in a telecommunications joint venture that is created to provide broadband services to areas within the jurisdiction of the municipality, county or cooperative that has been determined to be an historically unserved area, meaning that the area does not have access to broadband Internet services, has been an area developed for residential use for more than five (5) years, and is outside the service area of a video or cable service local franchise holder or the franchise area of a holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority.

For purposes of this section, a “telecommunications joint venture” means a joint venture or other business relationship with one (1) or more third parties to provide broadband services that may include broadband Internet services, voice over Internet protocol telephonic services, video over Internet protocol services and similar services provided over broadband facilities.

A telecommunications joint venture authorized by this section shall only be authorized to provide broadband services in historically unserved areas.

A telecommunications joint venture created and operated pursuant to the authority granted in this section may be subsidized by one (1) or more of the participants as may be determined by the participants; provided, however, that electric cooperatives and municipal electric systems shall comply with:

Any applicable provisions of contracts with suppliers of electricity prohibiting or otherwise limiting cross-subsidies of services with electricity revenues;

Chapter 52, part 6 of this title; and

Title 65, chapter 25, part 2.

It is the legislative intent that any joint venture established under this section shall not be subsidized by revenues from power or other utility operations.

Until July 1, 2018, unless such date is extended by the general assembly, notwithstanding § 65-21-105, in any area of the state determined by the department, in accordance with subsection (d), to be an historically unserved area where there is no access to broadband Internet services, a municipality or cooperatively owned utility shall not receive or request in exchange for new pole attachments any pole attachment charge from a cable or video service provider, or a telecommunications joint venture seeking to provide new broadband Internet services to the area that exceeds fifty percent (50%) of the highest pole attachment rate charged by the municipality or cooperatively owned utility to a cable service provider on January 1, 2008. For purposes of the discounted pole attachment charge for new pole attachments in historically unserved areas, no increase in the underlying pole attachment rate shall raise the discounted rate until July 1, 2018, unless such date is extended by the general assembly. This subdivision (c)(1) does not apply to any pole attachment charges for poles where, as of January 1, 2008, the cable or video service provider or a telecommunications joint venture is paying a pole attachment charge.

A municipality or cooperatively owned utility shall provide access to its poles and conduit located in public rights-of-way to any entity listed in subdivision (c)(1) that requests a pole attachment agreement on terms and conditions consistent with this section and other applicable law in the historically unserved area.

Any municipality or county government seeking to establish a joint venture as provided in this part shall apply to the department for a finding that the area is historically unserved and that no private provider intends to serve that area. The applicant shall provide a copy of the application to all telecommunications providers offering service in the area applied for and to all holders of state-issued certificates of franchise authority or local franchises in areas within fifty (50) miles of the area applied for, referred to in this subsection (d) as area broadband providers, at the same time it submits its application to the department. The application shall include proof that the municipality or county has publicly advertised its intent to establish a joint venture to provide service pursuant to this section. The municipality or county shall demonstrate that it has provided notice of its intent to all area broadband providers at least sixty (60) days prior to its submission of its application to the department. All area broadband providers shall have the right to submit comments regarding any application to the department. All records of a telecommunications joint venture shall be available for disclosure and public inspection pursuant to title 10, chapter 7. All meetings of or pertaining to a telecommunications joint venture shall be open meetings in accordance with title 8, chapter 44.

The comptroller of the treasury in cooperation with the department shall provide a report to the general assembly not later than January 31, 2011, and thereafter on January 31 annually, on the status of the provision of broadband services in accordance with this section.

Acts 2008, ch. 932, § 17.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of electric cooperative to provide broadband internet service. OAG 14-33, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 35 (3/18/14).

7-59-317. Notices to affected local governments.

A holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority shall provide affected local governments with notices as provided in this section, which notices shall include at a minimum:

Notice of filing of an application for a state-issued certificate of franchise authority, contemporaneously with the filing of the application;

Notice of offering service for purchase in an affected county or municipality, ten (10) days prior to providing service;

Notice of filing of an amendment to its application or its previously granted state-issued certificate of franchise authority, contemporaneously with the filing of the amendment with the department;

Notice of its intent to transfer its state-issued certificate of franchise authority to a successor in interest at least ten (10) days prior to the consummation of the transaction; and

Notice of termination of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority, contemporaneously with the filing of the notice with the department.

Acts 2008, ch. 932, § 18.

7-59-318. Obligation to indemnify and hold harmless — Exceptions.

The holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority agrees to indemnify and hold harmless the state, municipality, county and any employee or representative of the state, municipality or county, individually and collectively referred to in this section and § 7-59-305(c)(4) as the indemnitee, as well as any political subdivision of the state and any employee or representative of the political subdivision, from all claims, demands, causes of action, liability, judgments, costs and expenses or losses for injury or death to persons or damage to property owned by, and workers' compensation claims, collectively referred to in this section as claims, against any parties indemnified in accordance with this section, arising out of, caused by, or as a result of the holder's exercising its authority granted under a state-issued certificate of franchise authority, except for claims related to public, educational or governmental channels controlled by an indemnitee or other third-party designated by the indemnitee; provided, that the indemnitee shall give the holder written notice of the holder's obligation to indemnify the indemnitee within ten (10) business days of receipt of a claim. Should the indemnitee determine that it is necessary for it to employ separate counsel, the costs for the separate counsel shall be the responsibility of the indemnitee. If the indemnitee determines in good faith that its interests cannot be represented by the holder, the holder shall be excused from any obligation to defend that indemnitee and shall have standing to intervene in any proceeding relating to such claims, but shall remain obligated to indemnify the indemnitee as provided in this section and shall retain the right to participate in the relevant proceeding to protect its own interests.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), a holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority shall not be required to indemnify or hold harmless any indemnitee whose negligence or willful misconduct caused the claims.

No indemnitee shall settle any claim for which a holder is responsible without the written consent of the holder.

Acts 2008, ch. 932, § 19.